Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Part 6

Tennessee Agricultural Hall of Fame

43-1-601. Creation.

There is created and established the Tennessee agricultural hall of fame, to be created, established, and governed as provided by this part.

Acts 1937, ch. 43, § 1.

Cross-References. Animals and animal husbandry, title 44.

Chief executive officers of administrative departments, § 4-3-111.

Department of agriculture, creation, organization and powers of administrative, title 4, ch. 3, part 2.

Department of environment and conservation, title 4, ch. 3, part 5.

Departments and divisions, title 4, ch. 3, part 2.

Farmers' extension work, § 5-9-104.

Food, drugs and cosmetics, title 53.

Natural areas preservation, title 11, ch. 14.

Salaries of Class 1 and Class 2 officers, § 8-23-101.

State forests, title 11, ch. 4.

Tennessee heritage conservation trust fund, title 11, ch. 7.

43-1-602. Board — Members.

The Tennessee agricultural hall of fame is placed under the general supervision of a board consisting of nine (9) members composed of the following:

Commissioner of agriculture;

Dean of the college of agricultural sciences and natural resources of the University of Tennessee;

Dean of the University of Tennessee extension;

President of the Tennessee Farm Bureau Federation;

State master of the Grange;

State supervisor of vocational agriculture; and

Three (3) members to be appointed by the governor.

All members shall serve without compensation.

Acts 1937, ch. 43, § 2; 2004, ch. 517, § 4.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2004, ch. 517, § 15 provided that the University of Tennessee extension service shall spend no funds beyond those currently budgeted to accelerate the replacement of signs, letterhead, and business cards on account of the provisions of the act.

The Tennessee agricultural hall of fame board, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2027. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-248.

43-1-603. Terms of members.

The term of office of each appointive member shall be two (2), four (4), and six (6) years, respectively, the tenure of office to be designated by the governor at the time of the original 1937 appointments.

Acts 1937, ch. 43, § 3.

43-1-604. Acceptance, admission and induction to hall of fame — Rules and regulations.

The board is empowered to formulate rules and regulations governing the acceptance and admission of candidates to the Tennessee agricultural hall of fame; provided, that no name shall be accepted until an authentic and written record of the achievements of the person in agricultural activities has been presented to and accepted by a majority vote of the board.

The board shall promulgate rules and regulations to prescribe procedures to be used for the induction of nominees; provided, that any nominee who is deceased shall be eligible for induction five (5) years from the date of such nominee's death.

Acts 1937, ch. 43, § 4; 1991, ch. 106, § 3.

43-1-605. Gifts, bequests and awards.

The board is empowered to accept and receive gifts, bequests and awards, which are to become the sole property of the Tennessee agricultural hall of fame, and which are to be kept in a proper manner in a suitable and available room or hall in some state-owned building at Nashville; provided, that duplicates of gifts, bequests and awards may be displayed in a suitable room in the college of agricultural sciences and natural resources at the University of Tennessee.

Acts 1937, ch. 43, § 5.

43-1-606. Travel expenses.

All reimbursement for travel expenses shall be in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

Acts 1976, ch. 806, § 1.

43-1-607. Biennial report.

The board shall prepare a report to be delivered to the chair of the agriculture and natural resources committee of the house of representatives and the chair of the energy, agriculture and natural resources committee of the senate by February 15 of each odd-numbered year. The report shall provide information regarding the activities of the board for the previous two (2) years.

Acts 1991, ch. 106, § 4; 2013, ch. 236, § 1.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment substituted “the chair of the agriculture and natural resources committee of the house of representatives and the chair of the energy, agriculture and natural resources committee of the senate” for “the chair of the house agriculture committee and the chair of the senate labor, commerce and agriculture committee” in the first sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 236, § 94. April 19, 2013.